Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3610
Act; violation; provisions applicable.

A violation of any provision of the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Act or any rule and regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

In addition to any other applicable penalties for violations of Chapter 44, the director may require an issuer violating any provision of the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Act or any rule or regulation issued under the act to cease marketing any medicare supplement policy or certificate in this state which is related directly or indirectly to a violation or may require such issuer to take such actions as are necessary to comply with the act, or both.

Laws 1980, LB 877, § 10;

Laws 1988, LB 998, § 11;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 33;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 28.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.